Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION CANCELLATION; STONE ARCH BRIDGE.new text end new text begin The uncommitted balance of the appropriation in fiscal year 2024 under Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (e), for the Stone Arch Bridge in the city of Minneapolis, estimated to be $19,337, is canceled to the general fund on the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 30, 2025. new text end